Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Chapter 8. Commonwealth Public Safety Medal of Valor Act.

§ 9.1-800.
Commonwealth Public Safety Medal of Valor.

There is hereby established the Commonwealth Public Safety Medal of Valor. The Governor may award and present the Commonwealth Public Safety Medal of Valor, of appropriate design with ribbons and appurtenances, to a Virginia public safety officer for performance above and beyond the call of duty involving extraordinary valor in the face of grave danger, at great personal risk. The public safety officer shall have exhibited uncommon valor, which clearly distinguishes the officer as performing above and beyond normal job requirements. The Commonwealth Public Safety Medal of Valor shall be the highest award for valor by a public safety officer conferred by the Commonwealth. The Governor may select no more than three recipients for the Commonwealth Public Safety Medal of Valor award each year, unless the Governor determines that extraordinary circumstances warrant the selection of additional recipients.

History.

2002, c. 150.

§ 9.1-801.
Public safety officer defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “public safety officer” includes a law-enforcement officer of the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions; a correctional officer as defined in §

53.1-1

; a correctional officer employed at a juvenile correctional facility as the term is defined in §

66-25.3

; a jail officer; a regional jail or jail farm superintendent; a member of any fire company or department or nonprofit or volunteer emergency medical services agency that has been recognized by an ordinance or resolution of the governing body of any county, city, or town of the Commonwealth as an integral part of the official safety program of such county, city, or town; an arson investigator; a member of the Virginia National Guard or the Virginia Defense Force while such a member is serving in the Virginia National Guard or the Virginia Defense Force on official state duty or federal duty under Title 32 of the United States Code; any special agent of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority; any police agent appointed under the provisions of § 56-353; any regular or special conservation police officer who receives compensation from a county, city, or town or from the Commonwealth appointed pursuant to §

29.1-200

; any commissioned forest warden appointed pursuant to § 10.1-1135; any member or employee of the Virginia Marine Resources Commission granted the power to arrest pursuant to §

28.2-900

; any Department of Emergency Management hazardous materials officer; any nonfirefighter regional hazardous materials emergency response team member; any investigator who is a full-time sworn member of the security division of the Virginia Lottery; any full-time sworn member of the enforcement division of the Department of Motor Vehicles meeting the Department of Criminal Justice Services qualifications, when fulfilling duties pursuant to §

46.2-217

; any campus police officer appointed under the provisions of Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 23.1; and any conservation officer of the Department of Conservation and Recreation commissioned pursuant to § 10.1-115.

History.

2002, c. 150; 2007, c. 87; 2011, cc. 572, 586; 2014, c. 225; 2015, cc. 38, 502, 503, 730.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 23.1” was substituted for “Chapter 17 (§ 23-232 et seq.) of Title 23” to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” near the middle.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 572 and 586 are identical, and twice deleted “State” preceding “Defense Force” near the middle.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 225 substituted “Virginia Lottery” for “State Lottery Department.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and substituted “Authority” for “Board” following “Alcoholic Beverage Control.”

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “or nonprofit or volunteer emergency medical services agency” for “or rescue squad” and made minor stylistic changes.

§§ 9.1-802,
9.1-803.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 594 and 681, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former
§§

9.1-802

and 9.1-803, pertaining to the Medal of Valor Review Board, were derived from Acts 2002, c. 150.